California statutes. Education Code
(D) They shall not be eligible for promotion into the regular classified service or, in districts that have adopted the merit system, shall not be subject to the provisions of Section 88061, until they have complied with the provisions of subdivision (c).

(c) At any time, after completion of six months of satisfactory service, a person serving in a “restricted” position shall be given the opportunity to take such qualifying examinations as are required for all other persons serving in the same class in the regular classified service. If the person satisfactorily completes the qualifying examination, regardless of final numerical listing on an eligibility list, he or she shall be accorded full rights, benefits and burdens of any other classified employee serving in the regular classified service. His or her service in the regular classified service shall be counted from the original date of employment in the “restricted” position and shall continue even though he or she continues to serve in a “restricted” position.

(d) This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to clearly set forth that positions normally a part of the classified service are included therein regardless of the source of income to sustain the positions and to effectively implement specially funded programs intended to provide job opportunities for untrained and impoverished persons but to do so in a manner that will not be disruptive nor detrimental to the normal employment procedures relating to classified school service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 180.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88005.1.

The governing board of a community college district may establish positions and employ persons in public service employment positions which are funded by the Comprehensive Employment and Training Act (CETA) and which are restricted by the act to a limited duration of participation.

The positions shall be a part of the classified service. Persons so employed shall be classified employees for all purposes except that they shall not be subject to the provisions of Sections 88091 and 88092, and they shall not acquire permanent status or seniority credit for the purpose of layoff or reemployment. Retirement benefits shall be subject to the applicable federal law.

Persons employed in and occupying such positions shall be eligible to apply for any position or class of positions within the classified service for which they meet the qualifications, and, upon employment in the regular classified service, shall have their classified service counted from the original date of employment in the CETA position.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 714, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

88006.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 88003 or Section 88076, which exempt certain types of positions or categories of personnel from the classified service of a community college district, persons serving in exempt positions or who serve in classified positions but are exempted from the classified service shall, nevertheless, be subject to the provisions of Sections 87408.6, 88021, 88022, 88023 and 88024. The governing board of every district shall, by rule or regulation, provide for the implementation of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to full-time day students regularly attending in the district of employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 43.   Effective June 11, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

88007.

(a) The “act” as used in this section shall mean the Federal Emergency Employment Act of 1971 (Public Law 92-54) or any similar federal law hereafter enacted to provide transitional employment in public service positions for unemployed or underemployed persons.

(b) Funds derived from the act shall not be expended for work that: (1) would otherwise have been performed at federal, state, or local expense; (2) will not result in an increase over the employment which would otherwise be available; (3) which will result in the displacement of permanent members of the classified service (including partial displacement, such as reduction in the hours of nonovertime work or wages or employment benefits); (4) or which will impair existing rights of permanent members of the classified service.

(c) If during the term of a contract or renewal thereof, executed under the act, a community college district is engaged in layoffs for lack of work or lack of funds of permanent classified employees serving in regular positions and is employing personnel or contemplates employing personnel in like or reasonably similar positions under the act, a report shall be submitted by the superintendent of schools to the governing board clearly demonstrating and substantiating the fact that the duties being performed by the permanent employees in regular positions who are being laid off will not be performed by personnel employed under the act.

Approval of the report by the governing board shall constitute its acceptance of the facts, as contained therein, and based thereon its affirmation of compliance with the contract executed under the act and this section.

This section shall apply to districts which have adopted the merit system in the same manner and with the same effect as though it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88008.

If the governing board of a community college district establishes positions in the categories described below and restricts initial appointments of new employees to persons in low-income groups or residing in specifically designated areas of the community, then such positions shall, in addition to the regular class title, be classified as “restricted.” The positions shall be part of the classified service and persons so employed shall be classified employees for all purposes except that (1) they shall not be subject to the provisions of Section 88091 or 88092, and (2) they shall not acquire permanent status or seniority credit and shall not be eligible for promotion into the regular classified service until they have complied with the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 88005.

The categories of positions for which the governing board may establish restrictions under this section are:

(a) The position of instructional aide, as defined in Section 88243.

(b) Any other position involving personal contacts with students or parents, that is established to assist college staff personnel responsible for college-community relations; educational support services for such areas as counseling, library, or health; or the correction or prevention of behavioral problems.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 404.)
-------------------------------------------

88009.

Governing boards shall fix and prescribe the duties to be performed by all persons in the classified service and other nonacademic positions of the community college district, except those persons employed as a part of a personnel commission staff as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 181.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88010.

Classified employees shall not be required to perform duties that are not fixed and prescribed for the position by the governing board in accordance with Section 88009, unless the duties reasonably relate to those fixed for the position by the board, for any period of time that exceeds five working days within a 15-calendar-day period except as authorized herein.

An employee may be required to perform duties inconsistent with those assigned to the position by the governing board for a period of more than five working days if his or her salary is adjusted upward for the entire period he or she is required to work out of classification and in amounts that will reasonably reflect the duties required to be performed outside his or her normal assigned duties.

Notwithstanding this section, a personnel commission and governing board, or a governing board in a nonmerit system district, by written rule, may provide for an upward salary adjustment for any classified employee required to work out of classification for any period of time less than that required herein.

It is the intent of this section to permit community college districts to temporarily work employees outside of their normal duties but in so doing to require that some additional compensation be provided the employee during such temporary assignments.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 190.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88010.5.

A classified employee employed by any community college district that decides to maintain classes on Saturday or Sunday, or both, shall not, without his or her written consent, be required to change his or her workweek to include Saturday or Sunday, or both. No classified employee shall be assigned to perform services on a Saturday or Sunday if the classified employee objects in writing that the assignment would conflict with his or her religious beliefs or practices. Enactment of this section shall cause no change or disruption in existing work schedules that may already include Saturday or Sunday as regular workdays.

This section shall not be construed as limiting the power of any governing board of a community college district to govern the schools of the district, including the assignment of classified employees employed by the district.

This section shall not be construed as modifying or otherwise affecting Section 88026, 88027, 88030, or 88040 or any other provisions of this code relating to employment of classified employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 139, Sec. 1.   Effective July 19, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

88011.

No community college district may adopt or maintain any rule or regulation which requires a candidate for a position in the classified service to be a resident of the district or to become a resident of the district, or which requires that an employee maintain residency within the district; nor may a district grant preferential points or other preferential treatment to those candidates or employees who are residents of the district. This section shall not apply to restricted positions as provided for in Sections 88005 and 88008.

The Legislature in enacting this section recognizes that the public school system of this state is the property of all its citizens, and that all qualified candidates for positions in the classified service, regardless of residence, should be granted the opportunity to compete for and obtain such positions based solely on merit and fitness.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88012.

If the governing board of any community college district employs staff assistants or field representatives to directly assist the governing board or individual governing board members in carrying out their policymaking duties, such assistants or representatives shall be members of the classified service, except that such assistants or representatives shall be exempt from all provisions of this code relating to obtaining a permanent status in any position in the district, and procedures pertaining to the recruitment, appointment, classification, and salary of members of the classified service.

Staff assistants shall serve at the pleasure of a majority of the governing board, and each field representative appointed by the governing board to assist an individual member shall serve at the pleasure of such member.

It is the intent of the Legislature that persons employed under Section 88012 will not be utilized for election campaigns of board members during hours of their employment.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88013.

(a) The governing board of a community college district shall prescribe written rules and regulations governing the personnel management of the classified service. These written rules and regulations shall be printed and made available to employees in the classified service, the public, and those concerned with the administration of this section, whereby these employees are, except as provided in Section 72411, designated as permanent employees of the district after serving a prescribed period of probation that shall not exceed six months or 130 days of paid service, whichever is longer. However, for a full-time peace officer or public safety dispatcher employed by a district operating a dispatch center certified by the Commission on Peace
 Officer Standards and Training to be designated as a permanent employee of the district, they shall serve a probationary period of not less than one year of paid service from their date of appointment to that full-time position. A permanent employee who accepts a promotion and fails to complete the probationary period for that promotional classification, shall be employed in the position from which the employee was promoted.

(b) An employee designated as a permanent employee shall be subject to disciplinary action only for cause as prescribed by rule or regulation of the governing board, but the governing board’s determination of the sufficiency of the cause for disciplinary action shall be conclusive.

(c) The governing board shall adopt rules of procedure for disciplinary
 proceedings that shall contain a provision for informing the employee by written notice of the specific charges against the employee, a statement of the employee’s right to a hearing on those
 charges, and the time within which the hearing may be requested which shall be not less than five days after service of the notice to the employee, and a card or paper, the signing and filing of which shall constitute a demand for hearing, and a denial of all charges. The burden of proof shall remain with the governing board, and any rule or regulation to the contrary shall be void.

(d) Disciplinary action shall not be taken for any cause that arose before the employee became permanent, or for any cause that arose more than two years preceding the date of the filing of the notice of cause, unless the cause was concealed or not disclosed by the employee when it could be reasonably assumed that the employee should have disclosed the facts to the employing district.

(e) This section shall not be construed to prohibit the governing board, pursuant to the terms of an agreement with an employee organization under Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, from delegating its authority to determine whether sufficient cause exists for disciplinary action against classified employees, excluding peace officers as defined in Section 830.32 of the Penal Code, to an impartial third-party hearing officer. However, the governing board shall retain authority to review the determination under the standards set forth in Section 1286.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(f) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), a permanent employee who timely requests a hearing on charges against the employee shall not be suspended without pay,
 suspended with a reduction in pay, demoted with a reduction in pay, or dismissed before a decision is rendered after the hearing unless the governing board, or an impartial third-party hearing officer provided pursuant to the terms of an agreement with an employee organization under Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, finds that at the time discipline was imposed at the conclusion of the review process specified in Skelly v. State Personnel Bd. (1975) 15 Cal.3d 194, the employer demonstrated by a preponderance of the evidence
 that the employee engaged in criminal misconduct, misconduct that presents a risk of harm to students, staff, or property, or committed habitual violations of the district’s policies or regulations.

(2) If a hearing on the charges will be conducted by an impartial
 third-party hearing officer or the governing board pursuant to subdivision (e), the community college district may stop paying a permanent employee before a decision is rendered after 30 calendar days from the date the hearing is requested.

(3) To the extent that this subdivision conflicts with a provision of a collective bargaining agreement entered into by a public school employer and an exclusive bargaining representative before January 1, 2023, pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, this
 subdivision shall not apply to the community college district until the expiration or renewal of that collective bargaining agreement.

(g) This section shall apply only to districts not incorporating the merit system as outlined in Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(h) To the extent that this section, as amended by Assembly Bill 275 of the 2021–22 Regular Session, conflicts with a provision of a collective bargaining agreement entered into by a public school employer and an exclusive bargaining representative before January 1, 2022, pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the changes made to this section by Assembly Bill 275 of the 2021–22 Regular Session shall not apply to the community college
 district until expiration or renewal of that collective bargaining agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 913, Sec. 2.   (AB 2413)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

88014.

Notwithstanding Section 88013, the governing board may lay off and reemploy classified employees only in accordance with procedures provided by Sections 88117 and 88127, except the term “personnel commission,” as used in Section 88117, shall be construed to mean the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 192.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88015.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who was subject to being, or was in fact, laid off for lack of work or lack of funds and who elected service retirement from the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall be placed on an appropriate reemployment list. The district shall notify the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of the fact that retirement was due to layoff for lack of work or of funds. If the person is subsequently subject to reemployment and accepts, in writing, the appropriate vacant position, the district shall maintain the vacancy until the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System has properly processed his or her request for reinstatement from retirement.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 193.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88016.

A notice of disciplinary action shall contain a statement in ordinary and concise language of the specific acts and omissions upon which the disciplinary action is based, a statement of the cause for the action taken and, if it is claimed that an employee has violated a rule or regulation of the public school employer, such rule or regulation shall be set forth in said notice.

A notice of disciplinary action stating one or more causes or grounds for disciplinary action established by any rule, regulation, or statute in the language of the rule, regulation, or statute, is insufficient for any purpose.

A proceeding may be brought by, or on behalf of, the employee to restrain any further proceedings under any notice of disciplinary action violative of this provision.

This section shall apply to proceedings conducted under the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88017.

(a) (1) No later than March 15 and before a classified employee is given notice by the governing board of the community college district that the classified employee’s services will not be required for the ensuing year, the governing board of the community college district and the employee shall be given written notice by the superintendent of the community college district or the superintendent’s designee, or, in the case of a community college district that has no superintendent, by the clerk or secretary of the governing board of the community college district, that it has been recommended that the notice be given to the employee, and stating the reasons therefor.

(2) Until the classified employee has requested a hearing as provided in
 subdivision (b) or has waived their right to a hearing, the notice and the reasons therefor shall be confidential and shall not be divulged by any person, except as may be necessary in the performance of duties. However, the violation of this requirement of confidentiality, in and of itself, shall not in any manner be construed as affecting the validity of any hearing conducted pursuant to this section.

(b) A classified employee may request a hearing to determine if there is cause for not reemploying the employee for the ensuing year. A request for a hearing shall be in writing and shall be delivered to the person who sent the notice, on or before a date specified in subdivision (a), which shall not be less than seven days after the date on which the notice is served upon the employee. If an employee fails to request a hearing on or before the date specified, this failure to do so shall constitute waiver of the employee’s right to a hearing.
 The notice provided for in subdivision (a) shall advise the employee of the provisions of this subdivision.

(c) If a hearing is requested by a classified employee under subdivision (b), the proceeding shall be conducted and a decision made in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the governing board of a community college district shall have all the powers granted to an agency in that chapter, except that all of the following shall apply:

(1) The respondent shall file their notice of defense, if any, within five days after service upon the respondent of the accusation and the respondent shall be notified of this five-day period for filing the accusation.

(2) The discovery authorized by Section 11507.6 of the Government Code shall be
 available only if a request is made for discovery within 15 days after service of the accusation, and the notice required by Section 11505 of the Government Code shall so indicate.

(3) The hearing shall be conducted by an administrative law judge who shall prepare a proposed decision, containing findings of fact and a determination as to whether the charges sustained by the evidence are related to the welfare of the colleges and the students thereof. The proposed decision shall be prepared for the governing board of the community college and shall contain a determination as to the sufficiency of the cause and a recommendation as to disposition. However, the governing board of the community college shall make the final determination as to the sufficiency of the cause and disposition. None of the findings, recommendations, or determinations contained in the proposed decision prepared by the administrative law judge shall be binding on the
 governing board of the community college or on any court in future litigation. Copies of the proposed decision shall be submitted to the governing board of the community college and to the classified employee on or before May 7 of the year in which the proceeding is commenced. All expenses of the hearing, including the cost of the administrative law judge, shall be paid by the governing board of the community college from community college district funds.

(4) An employee may be represented at the hearing by an attorney or by a nonattorney representative of the employee organization designated as the exclusive representative of the employees in the employee’s classification, if any.

(d) (1) The determination of the governing board of a community college
 district to not reemploy a classified employee for the ensuing college year shall be for cause only. The determination of the governing board of the community college district as to the sufficiency of the cause pursuant to this section shall be conclusive, but the cause shall relate solely to the welfare of the colleges and the students thereof and provided that cause is a bona fide lack of funds or reduction in services. The decision made after the hearing shall be effective on May 15 of the year the proceeding is commenced.

(2) For purposes of this section, “cause” for layoff includes community college district compliance with the seniority requirements of this code, including Section 88127.

(e) Notice of termination to the classified employee by the governing board of the community college district that the employee’s service will not be required for the ensuing year shall be
 given no later than May 15.

(f) If the governing board of a community college district notifies a classified employee that the employee’s services will not be required for the ensuing year, the governing board of the community college district, within 10 days after receipt of the employee’s written request, shall provide the employee with a statement of its reasons for not reemploying the employee for the ensuing college year.

(g) Any notice or request under this section shall be deemed sufficient when it is delivered in person to the employee to whom it is directed, or when it is deposited in the United States registered mail, postage prepaid, and addressed to the last known address of the employee.

(h) (1) If the governing board of a community college district does not give notice provided for
 in subdivision (e) on or before May 15, a permanent employee shall be deemed reemployed for the ensuing college year, except that this section shall not be construed to interfere with the right of a district to release probationary employees who never become permanent without notice or hearing.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “permanent employee” includes an employee who was permanent at the time the notice or right to a hearing was required and an employee who became permanent after the date of the required notice.

(i) If, after request for hearing pursuant to subdivision (b), any continuance is granted pursuant to Section 11524 of the Government Code, the dates prescribed in subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and (h) that occur on or after the date of granting the continuance shall be extended for a period of time equal to the continuance.

(j) (1) A classified employee shall not be laid off if a short-term employee is retained to render a service that the classified employee is qualified to render. This subdivision does not create a layoff notice requirement for any individual hired as a short-term employee, as defined in Section 88003, for a period not exceeding 60 days.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to the retention of a short-term employee, as defined in Section 88003, who is hired for a period not exceeding 60 days after which the short-term service may not be extended or renewed.

(k) Notwithstanding the other requirements of this code respecting layoff of permanent classified employees, when classified positions must be eliminated as a result of the expiration of a specially funded program, the employees to be laid off
 shall be given written notice not less than 60 days prior to the effective date of their layoff informing them of their layoff date and their displacement rights, if any, and reemployment rights.

(l) If, after January 1, 2021, the Legislature provides academic employees with any additional rights to notice or hearing as to layoffs, then permanent classified employees and those who become permanent classified employees shall be afforded the same rights by the community college district.

(m) The governing board of a community college district may adopt, from time to time, rules and procedures not inconsistent with this section that may be necessary to effectuate this section.

(n) This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article
 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 42.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

88018.

Any division, uniting, unionization, annexation, merger, or change of community college district boundaries shall not affect the rights of persons employed in nonacademic positions to continue in employment for not less than two years and to retain the salary, leaves and other benefits which they would have had had the reorganization not occurred, and in the manner provided in this article:

(a) All employees of every community college district which is included in any other district, or all districts included in a new district, shall become employees of the new district.

(b) When a portion of the territory of any district becomes part of another district employees regularly assigned to perform their duties in the territory affected shall become employees of the acquiring district. Employees whose assignments pertained to the affected territory, but whose employment situs was not in such territory, may elect to remain with the original district or become employees of the acquiring district.

(c) When the territory of any district is divided between or among two or more districts and the original district ceases to exist, employees of the original district regularly assigned to perform their duties in any specific territory of such district shall become employees of the district acquiring the territory. Employees not assigned to specific territory within the original district shall become employees of any acquiring district at their election.

(d) Employees regularly assigned by the original district to any school in said district shall be an employee of the district in which said school is located. Except as herein provided, nothing herein shall deprive the governing board of the acquiring district from making reasonable reassignments of duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 183.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88019.

Whenever, by reason of any reorganization, other than the unification of districts, all or part of the territory of any community college district which has adopted the merit system is included within any district, or in any new district, the governing board of the acquiring or new district shall adopt such merit system. In the event that any district simultaneously acquires all or part of the territory of two or more districts which have previously adopted the merit system the governing board of the acquiring or new district shall adopt a merit system containing such provisions as are necessary to afford to all employees the rights guaranteed by this section. The employees of the reorganized or new district shall retain all rights and privileges as if they had been employed under the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter, with seniority commencing as of the date of original employment in their original district. Where there are more than a sufficient number of employees for a given classification under the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter, such personnel shall be retained in employment for a period of not less than two years as if the reorganization had not occurred but without prejudice to the powers of the personnel commission and governing board of the reorganized district to reasonably reassign such persons. If at the expiration of such period, upon a finding made by the personnel commission that there are excess personnel in any given classification, such personnel shall, if the governing board so directs, be placed upon appropriate reemployment lists for 39 months and, if so placed, shall be offered and may accept positions of lower rank in their line of promotion in the order of seniority as established by this section in accordance with rules drawn in compliance with the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter. The acceptance of a position in lower rank in accordance herewith shall not be deemed to constitute a waiver of the right to reemployment at the original level should a vacancy at such level occur within the period mentioned in this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88020.

Any person, not a student or substitute employee, who has been employed by a community college student body organization pursuant to Section 76060 for a period of at least six months immediately preceding becoming a member of the classified service pursuant to Section 76060 or 81676 shall, without examination, be deemed to be a permanent classified service employee of the community college district.

Any person not a student or substitute employee employed by a student body organization pursuant to Section 76060 for less than six months immediately preceding becoming a member of the classified service pursuant to Section 76060 or 81676 shall, without examination, be deemed to be a probationary classified employee of the district.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 194.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88020.5.

The governing board of a community college district shall employ persons for food service positions as a part of the classified service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 705.)
-------------------------------------------

88021.

Whenever a governing board of a community college district requires a physical examination to be taken by a classified employee or employees, either by rule or by its direction or the direction of its authorized district administrator; or when classifed employees are required by law to submit to a physical examination for continuance in employment, the board shall either provide the required examination, cause it to be provided, or provide the employee with reasonable reimbursement for the required examination.

If the governing board requires a physical examination or an examination is required by law as a condition of preemployment, it may cause the required examination to be given. It may, if an applicant is required to take a preemployment physical examination, provide for reasonable reimbursement if the applicant is subsequently employed by the district.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88022.

No person shall be employed or retained in employment by a community college district who has been convicted of any sex offense as defined in Section 87010 or controlled substance offense as defined in Section 87011. If, however, any such conviction is reversed and the person is acquitted of the offense in a new trial or the charges against him or her are dismissed, this section does not prohibit his or her employment thereafter.

Further, the governing board of a community college district may employ a person convicted of a controlled substance offense if the governing board of the district determines, from the evidence presented, that the person has been rehabilitated for at least five years.

The governing board shall determine the type and manner of presentation of the evidence, and the determination of the governing board as to whether or not the person has been rehabilitated is final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1635, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

88023.

No person shall be employed or retained in employment by a community college district who has been determined to be a sexual psychopath, as defined in Section 6300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or under similar provisions of law of any other state. If, however, such a determination is reversed and the person is determined not to be a sexual psychopath in a new proceeding, or the proceeding to determine whether he or she is a sexual psychopath is dismissed, this section does not prohibit his or her employment thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 195.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88024.
